District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.24

Record keeping.

(a)

Repealed.

(b)

The Department shall maintain a register of all applicants for registration showing for each applicant the date of the application, name, qualifications, place of business, place of applicant’s residence, and whether the certificate was granted or denied.

(c)

Repealed.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2324, 52 DCR 7503
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2062(d), 54 DCR 7052
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(g), 61 DCR 3892

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-20, in subsec. (b), substituted “The Department shall and the Commission may” for “the Commission shall”.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 repealed (a) and (c); and deleted “and the Commission may” following “Department shall” in (d).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2324 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2062(d) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108:

Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.